Utah statutes.
63M-1-203.   Powers and duties of director.

(1)  The director, with the approval of the governor, may:

(a)  by following the procedures and requirements of Title 63J, Chapter 5, Federal Funds Procedures, seek federal grants, loans, or participation in federal programs;

(b)  enter into lawful contracts or agreements with other states, any chamber of commerce organization, any service club, and a private entity pursuant to Section 63M-1-2610; and

(c)  annually prepare and submit to the governor a budget of the office's financial requirements.

(2)  If any federal program requires the expenditure of state funds as a condition to participation by the state in any fund, property, or service, with the governor's approval, the director shall expend whatever funds are necessary out of the money provided by the Legislature for the use of the office.



Amended by Chapter 352, 2008 General Session 

Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

